New Jersey, session 222, A1030.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Community Affairs shall verify that applicants for benefits under the federal Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program, established by 42 U.S.C. s.8621 et seq., meet the applicable income requirements prior to awarding benefits under the program, using appropriate data supplied by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development and the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. b.    The requirements of subsection a. of this section may be satisfied by verifying the income of a portion of all applicants for Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program benefits on a random or risk basis; provided, however, that the Department of Community Affairs shall conduct an income verification review of each applicant claiming to have no income. c.    The Department of Community Affairs may utilize a third-party commercial consumer reporting agency, in accordance with the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. s.1681 et seq., for the purpose of acquiring an applicants necessary income information, required pursuant to subsection a. of this section. d.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs, in consultation with the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development and the Director of the Division of Taxation, shall promulgate rules and regulations, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), in order to effectuate the provisions of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except the commissioner may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.